Hawaii statutes.
[§461J-10.12] Continuing competence
subject matter requirements and other limitations. [Section effective
December 31, 2016.] For each renewal period, a licensee's
continuing competence units shall include the following:

(1) Two units in ethics, laws, and rules
(jurisprudence), or some combination thereof; and

(2) Four units in life support for health care
professionals; provided that such training shall be comparable to, or more
advanced than, the American Heart Association's basic life support health care
provider course. [L 2013, c 35, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next